Idaho, session 2026, S1327.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-624, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-624. ELECTION OF PRECINCT COMMITTEEMEN -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At
the primary election, 1980, and every two (2) years thereafter, a precinct
committeeman for each political party shall be elected in every voting
precinct within each county. The term of office of a precinct committeeman
shall be from the eighth day following the primary election until the eighth
day following the next succeeding primary election.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of precinct committeeman
unless he has attained the age of eighteen (18) years of age at the time of his
election, is a citizen of the United States, and is a registered elector of
the voting precinct for a period of six (6) months next preceding his elec-
tion.
(3) Each candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk.
(4) No filing fee shall be charged any candidate at the time of his fil-
ing his declaration of candidacy.
(5) A political party may add additional qualifications for such
party's precinct committeemen that are not in conflict with the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.